Hawaii statutes.
[PART VI.]
BIOSECURITY PROGRAM

[§150A-51] Biosecurity program;
establishment. The department shall establish a biosecurity program
authorized under this chapter that shall interface with other relevant state
law; provided that the biosecurity program is not inconsistent with federal
law. [L 2008, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next